Hawaii statutes.
§576B-610 Effect of registration for
modification. A tribunal of this State may enforce a child support order
of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as
if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this State, but the registered
order may be modified only if the requirements of section 576B-611 or 576B-613
have been met. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next